California, session 20252026, AB2773.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2570.4 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2570.4. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as preventing or restricting the practice, services, or activities of any of the following persons:(a) Any person licensed or otherwise recognized in this state by any other law or regulation when that person is engaged in the profession or occupation for which they are licensed or otherwise recognized.(b) Any person pursuing a supervised course of study leading to a degree or certificate in occupational therapy at an American Occupational Therapy Association’s Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education (ACOTE)-accredited educational program, if the person is designated by a title that clearly indicates their status as a student or trainee.(c) Any person fulfilling the supervised fieldwork experience requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 2570.6, if the experience constitutes a part of the experience necessary to meet the requirement of that provision.(d) Any person completing a supervised entry-level doctoral capstone experience requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 2570.6, if the experience constitutes a as part of the experience necessary to meet the requirement of that provision. the requirements for obtaining an occupational therapy doctorate degree from an ACOTE-accredited educational institution.(e) Any person performing occupational therapy services in the state if all of the following apply:(1) An application for licensure as an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant has been filed with the board pursuant to Section 2570.6 and an application for a license in this state has not been previously denied.(2) The person possesses a current, active, and nonrestricted license to practice occupational therapy under the laws of another state that the board determines has licensure requirements at least as stringent as the requirements of this chapter.(3) Occupational therapy services are performed in association with an occupational therapist licensed under this chapter, and for no more than 60 days from the date on which the application for licensure was filed with the board.(f) Any person employed as an aide subject to the supervision requirements of this section.SEC. 2.Section 2570.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2570.6.An applicant applying for a license as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant shall file with the board a written application provided by the board, showing to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant meets all of the following requirements:(a)That the applicant is in good standing and has not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a license under Section 480.(b)(1)That the applicant has successfully completed the academic requirements of an educational program for occupational therapists or occupational therapy assistants that is approved by the board and accredited by the American Occupational Therapy Association’s Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education (ACOTE), or accredited or approved by the American Occupational Therapy Association’s (AOTA) predecessor organization, or approved by AOTA’s Career Mobility Program.(2)The curriculum of an educational program for occupational therapists shall contain the content required by the ACOTE accreditation standards, or as approved by AOTA’s predecessor organization, or as approved by AOTA’s Career Mobility Program.(c)(1)For an applicant who is a graduate of an occupational therapy or occupational therapy assistant educational program who is unable to provide evidence of having met the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), they may demonstrate passage of the examination administered by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy, the American Occupational Therapy Certification Board, or the American Occupational Therapy Association, as evidence of having successfully satisfied the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(2)For an applicant who completed AOTA’s Career Mobility Program, they shall demonstrate participation in the program and passage of the examination administered by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy, the American Occupational Therapy Certification Board, or the American Occupational Therapy Association, as evidence of having successfully satisfied the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b).(d)That the applicant has successfully completed a period of supervised fieldwork experience approved by the board and arranged by a recognized ACOTE-accredited educational institution where the applicant met the academic requirements of subdivision (b). The fieldwork requirements for applicants applying for licensure as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant shall be consistent with the requirements of the ACOTE accreditation standards, or AOTA’s predecessor organization, or AOTA’s Career Mobility Program, that were in effect when the applicant completed their educational program.(e)That the applicant has successfully completed a supervised entry-level doctoral capstone experience approved by the board and arranged by an ACOTE-accredited educational institution where the applicant has met the academic requirements of subdivision (b). The doctoral capstone requirement for applicants applying for licensure as an occupational therapist shall be consistent with the ACOTE accreditation standards in effect when the applicant completed the entry-level occupational therapy doctorate program.(f)That the applicant has passed an examination as provided in Section 2570.7.(g)That the applicant, at the time of application, is a person over 18 years of age, is not addicted to alcohol or any controlled substance, and has not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. Section 2570.16 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2570.16. Initial license and renewal fees shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed a ceiling of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per year. The board shall establish the following additional fees:(a) An application fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50).(b) A late renewal fee as provided for in Section 2570.10.(c) A limited permit fee not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).(d) A pocket card fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50).(e) A duplicate wall certificate fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50).(f) A fee for a letter of good standing, endorsements, or verification of licensure not to exceed fifty dollars ($50).(g) A fee to collect fingerprints for criminal history record checks. This fee shall not exceed the amount charged by the agency providing the criminal history record checks.(h) A fee to query the National Practitioner Data Bank for applicants for licensure and renewal of licensure. The fee shall not exceed the amount charged per query.SEC. 4.SEC. 3. Section 2570.19 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2570.19. (a) There is hereby created a California Board of Occupational Therapy, hereafter referred to as the board. The board shall enforce and administer this chapter.(b) The members of the board shall consist of the following:(1) Three occupational therapists who shall have practiced occupational therapy for five years.(2) One occupational therapy assistant who shall have assisted in the practice of occupational therapy for five years.(3) Three public members who shall not be licentiates of the board, of any other board under this division, or of any board referred to in Section 1000 or 3600.(c) The Governor shall appoint the three occupational therapists and one occupational therapy assistant to be members of the board. The Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member. Not more than one member of the board shall be appointed from the full-time faculty of any university, college, or other educational institution.(d) All members shall be residents of California at the time of their appointment. The occupational therapist and occupational therapy assistant members shall have been engaged in rendering occupational therapy services to the public, teaching, or research in occupational therapy for at least five years preceding their appointments.(e) The public members may not be or have ever been occupational therapists or occupational therapy assistants or in training to become occupational therapists or occupational therapy assistants. The public members may not be related to, or have a household member who is, an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant, and may not have had, within two years of the appointment, a substantial financial interest in a person regulated by the board.(f) The Governor shall appoint two board members for a term of one year, two board members for a term of two years, and one board member for a term of three years. Appointments made thereafter shall be for four-year terms, but no person shall be appointed to serve more than two consecutive terms. Terms shall begin on the first day of the calendar year and end on the last day of the calendar year or until successors are appointed, except for the first appointed members who shall serve through the last calendar day of the year in which they are appointed, before commencing the terms prescribed by this section. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. The board shall annually elect one of its members as president.(g) The board shall meet at least three times a year, meeting at least once each calendar year in northern California and once each calendar year in southern California. The board may convene from time to time until its business is concluded. Special meetings of the board may be held at any time and place designated by the board.(h) Notice of each meeting of the board shall be given in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(i) Members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to reasonable travel and other expenses incurred in the execution of their powers and duties in accordance with Section 103.(j) The appointing power shall have the power to remove any member of the board from office for neglect of any duty imposed by state law, for incompetency, or for unprofessional or dishonorable conduct.(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 5.SEC. 4. Section 2570.40 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2570.40. (a) An applicant or licensee who has an electronic mail address shall provide the board with that electronic mail address no later than July 1, 2027. The electronic mail address shall be considered confidential and not subject to public disclosure.(b) An applicant or licensee shall provide to the board any and all changes to their electronic mail address no later than 30 calendar days after the changes have occurred.(c) The board shall, with each renewal application, remind licensees and applicants of their obligation to report and keep current their electronic mail address with the board.